Hawaii statutes.
§804-5 By whom allowed. In cases where
the punishment for the offense charged may be imprisonment for life not subject
to parole, or imprisonment for a term more than ten years with or without fine,
a judge or justice of a court of record, including a district judge, shall be
competent to admit the accused to bail, in conformity with sections 804-3 to
804-6. In all other cases, the accused may be so admitted to bail by any judge
or justice of a court of record, including a district judge, and in cases, except
under section 712-1207, where the punishment for the offense charged may not
exceed two years' imprisonment with or without fine, the sheriff, the sheriff's
deputy, the chief of police or any person named by the chief of police, or the
sheriff of Kalawao, regardless of the circuit within which the alleged offense
was committed, may admit the accused person to bail. [L 1892, c 32, §3; RL
1925, §3980; am L 1931, c 231, §1; am L 1933, c 30, §1; RL 1935, §5434; RL
1945, §10735; RL 1955, §256-5; am L 1957, c 282, §9; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS
§709-5; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L
1994, c 181, §1; am L 1998, c 149, §4]

Rules of Court

Proceedings following arrest, see HRPP rule 5(a).

Bail; bond, see HRPP rule 46.

Case Notes

Since this section provides chief of police or designee with
independent authority and discretion to admit persons charged with misdemeanor
offenses to bail in accordance with §804-9, senior judge of family court lacked
authority to issue a bail schedule divesting police of that authority and
discretion. 75 H. 357, 861 P.2d 1205 (1993).

See 18 H. 500 (1907).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next